Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1840
Real property taxes; issuance of treasurer's tax deed; recording of proceedings.

The register of deeds shall record the evidence upon which the tax deeds are issued, and be entitled to the same fee therefor that may be allowed by law for recording deeds, and the county treasurer shall deliver the same to the register of deeds for that purpose.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 219, p. 470;

R.S.1913, § 6547;

C.S.1922, § 6075;

C.S.1929, § 77-2027;

R.S.1943, § 77-1840.

For fee for recording deed, see section 33-109.

This section makes the evidence, on which deeds were executed, a part of the public records in the office of the register of deeds. Lanigan v. Gilroy, 97 Neb. 754, 151 N.W. 297 (1915).

It is the duty of the register of deeds to record deed when presented for that purpose. Burnham v. State ex rel. Farmers Loan and Trust Co., 44 Neb. 438, 63 N.W. 45 (1895).